third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#afturmjáur
SFX 175 N 8
SFX 175 0 a .
SFX 175 0 an .
SFX 175 0 ar .
SFX 175 0 ari .
SFX 175 0 ir .
SFX 175 0 tt .
SFX 175 0 um .
SFX 175 0 ur .

#arbeiðsrúm
SFX 176 N 11
SFX 176 0 rúm .
SFX 176 0 rúma .
SFX 176 0 rúmanna .
SFX 176 0 rúmi .
SFX 176 0 rúmið .
SFX 176 0 rúmini .
SFX 176 0 rúminum .
SFX 176 0 rúms .
SFX 176 0 rúmsins .
SFX 176 0 rúmum .
SFX 176 0 rúmunum .

#altøgn
SFX 177 N 2
SFX 177 0 ar .
SFX 177 0 arinnar .

#alimatur
SFX 178 N 8
SFX 178 0 mat .
SFX 178 0 matar .
SFX 178 0 matarins .
SFX 178 0 mati .
SFX 178 0 matin .
SFX 178 0 matinum .
SFX 178 0 matur .
SFX 178 0 maturin .

#akkersbundin
SFX 179 N 8
SFX 179 0 bundið .
SFX 179 0 bundin .
SFX 179 0 bundna .
SFX 179 0 bundnan .
SFX 179 0 bundnar .
SFX 179 0 bundnari .
SFX 179 0 bundnir .
SFX 179 0 bundnum .

#altarsklæði
SFX 180 N 7
SFX 180 0 klæða .
SFX 180 0 klæðanna .
SFX 180 0 klæði .
SFX 180 0 klæðini .
SFX 180 0 klæðir .
SFX 180 0 klæðum .
SFX 180 0 klæðunum .

#beinhvítur
SFX 181 N 9
SFX 181 0 hvít .
SFX 181 0 hvíta .
SFX 181 0 hvítan .
SFX 181 0 hvítar .
SFX 181 0 hvítari .
SFX 181 0 hvítir .
SFX 181 0 hvítt .
SFX 181 0 hvítum .
SFX 181 0 hvítur .

#afturvegur
SFX 182 N 16
SFX 182 0 veg .
SFX 182 0 vega .
SFX 182 0 veganna .
SFX 182 0 vegar .
SFX 182 0 vegarins .
SFX 182 0 vegi .
SFX 182 0 vegin .
SFX 182 0 veginum .
SFX 182 0 vegir .
SFX 182 0 vegirnar .
SFX 182 0 vegirnir .
SFX 182 0 vegnum .
SFX 182 0 vegum .
SFX 182 0 vegunum .
SFX 182 0 vegur .
SFX 182 0 vegurin .

#altøgn
SFX 183 N 3
SFX 183 0 in .
SFX 183 0 ina .
SFX 183 0 ini .

#akkersspæl
SFX 184 N 15
SFX 184 0 spæl .
SFX 184 0 spæla .
SFX 184 0 spælanna .
SFX 184 0 spæli .
SFX 184 0 spælið .
SFX 184 0 spælini .
SFX 184 0 spælinum .
SFX 184 0 spæls .
SFX 184 0 spælsins .
SFX 184 0 spælum .
SFX 184 0 spælunum .
SFX 184 0 spøl .
SFX 184 0 spølini .
SFX 184 0 spølum .
SFX 184 0 spølunum .

#arvland
SFX 185 N 12
SFX 185 0 land .
SFX 185 0 landa .
SFX 185 0 landanna .
SFX 185 0 landi .
SFX 185 0 landið .
SFX 185 0 landinum .
SFX 185 0 lands .
SFX 185 0 landsins .
SFX 185 0 lond .
SFX 185 0 londini .
SFX 185 0 londum .
SFX 185 0 londunum .

#aftursettur
SFX 186 N 8
SFX 186 0 sett .
SFX 186 0 setta .
SFX 186 0 settan .
SFX 186 0 settar .
SFX 186 0 settari .
SFX 186 0 settir .
SFX 186 0 settum .
SFX 186 0 settur .

#arbeiðssemi
SFX 187 N 5
SFX 187 0 semi .
SFX 187 0 semið .
SFX 187 0 seminum .
SFX 187 0 semis .
SFX 187 0 semisins .

#afturhálsastykki
SFX 188 N 11
SFX 188 0 stykki .
SFX 188 0 stykkið .
SFX 188 0 stykkini .
SFX 188 0 stykkinum .
SFX 188 0 stykkir .
SFX 188 0 stykkis .
SFX 188 0 stykkisins .
SFX 188 0 stykkja .
SFX 188 0 stykkjanna .
SFX 188 0 stykkjum .
SFX 188 0 stykkjunum .

#afturslag
SFX 189 N 12
SFX 189 0 slag .
SFX 189 0 slaga .
SFX 189 0 slaganna .
SFX 189 0 slagi .
SFX 189 0 slagið .
SFX 189 0 slagnum .
SFX 189 0 slags .
SFX 189 0 slagsins .
SFX 189 0 sløg .
SFX 189 0 sløgini .
SFX 189 0 sløgum .
SFX 189 0 sløgunum .

#alintráður
SFX 190 N 20
SFX 190 0 tráð .
SFX 190 0 tráða .
SFX 190 0 tráðanna .
SFX 190 0 tráðar .
SFX 190 0 tráðarins .
SFX 190 0 tráði .
SFX 190 0 tráðin .
SFX 190 0 tráðinum .
SFX 190 0 tráðnum .
SFX 190 0 tráðum .
SFX 190 0 tráðunum .
SFX 190 0 tráður .
SFX 190 0 tráðurin .
SFX 190 0 træðri .
SFX 190 0 træðrinum .
SFX 190 0 træðrir .
SFX 190 0 træðrirnar .
SFX 190 0 træðrirnir .
SFX 190 0 træðrum .
SFX 190 0 træðrunum .

#áartrøll
SFX 191 N 10
SFX 191 l s .
SFX 191 l sins .
SFX 191 0 a .
SFX 191 0 anna .
SFX 191 0 i .
SFX 191 0 ið .
SFX 191 0 ini .
SFX 191 0 inum .
SFX 191 0 um .
SFX 191 0 unum .

#bjargingarlið
SFX 192 N 12
SFX 192 0 lið .
SFX 192 0 liða .
SFX 192 0 liðanna .
SFX 192 0 liði .
SFX 192 0 liðið .
SFX 192 0 liðini .
SFX 192 0 liðinum .
SFX 192 0 liðnum .
SFX 192 0 liðs .
SFX 192 0 liðsins .
SFX 192 0 liðum .
SFX 192 0 liðunum .

#arbeiðssemi
SFX 193 N 5
SFX 193 0 semi .
SFX 193 0 semin .
SFX 193 0 semina .
SFX 193 0 semini .
SFX 193 0 seminnar .

#aðalsfrúgv
SFX 194 N 4
SFX 194 0 m .
SFX 194 0 nna .
SFX 194 0 nni .
SFX 194 0 num .

#avlop
SFX 195 N 11
SFX 195 0 lop .
SFX 195 0 lopa .
SFX 195 0 lopanna .
SFX 195 0 lopi .
SFX 195 0 lopið .
SFX 195 0 lopini .
SFX 195 0 lopinum .
SFX 195 0 lops .
SFX 195 0 lopsins .
SFX 195 0 lopum .
SFX 195 0 lopunum .

#apukattur
SFX 196 N 14
SFX 196 t s .
SFX 196 t sins .
SFX 196 0 a .
SFX 196 0 anna .
SFX 196 0 ar .
SFX 196 0 arnar .
SFX 196 0 arnir .
SFX 196 0 i .
SFX 196 0 in .
SFX 196 0 inum .
SFX 196 0 um .
SFX 196 0 unum .
SFX 196 0 ur .
SFX 196 0 urin .

#andstøðuflokkur
SFX 197 N 15
SFX 197 0 flokk .
SFX 197 0 flokka .
SFX 197 0 flokkanna .
SFX 197 0 flokkar .
SFX 197 0 flokkarnar .
SFX 197 0 flokkarnir .
SFX 197 0 flokki .
SFX 197 0 flokkin .
SFX 197 0 flokkinum .
SFX 197 0 flokkum .
SFX 197 0 flokkunum .
SFX 197 0 flokkur .
SFX 197 0 flokkurin .
SFX 197 0 floks .
SFX 197 0 floksins .

#arbeiðsjarn
SFX 198 N 12
SFX 198 0 jarn .
SFX 198 0 jarna .
SFX 198 0 jarnanna .
SFX 198 0 jarni .
SFX 198 0 jarnið .
SFX 198 0 jarninum .
SFX 198 0 jarns .
SFX 198 0 jarnsins .
SFX 198 0 jørn .
SFX 198 0 jørnini .
SFX 198 0 jørnum .
SFX 198 0 jørnunum .

#alduskot
SFX 199 N 11
SFX 199 0 skot .
SFX 199 0 skota .
SFX 199 0 skotanna .
SFX 199 0 skoti .
SFX 199 0 skotið .
SFX 199 0 skotini .
SFX 199 0 skotinum .
SFX 199 0 skots .
SFX 199 0 skotsins .
SFX 199 0 skotum .
SFX 199 0 skotunum .

#angurfullur
SFX 200 N 9
SFX 200 0 full .
SFX 200 0 fulla .
SFX 200 0 fullan .
SFX 200 0 fullar .
SFX 200 0 fullari .
SFX 200 0 fullir .
SFX 200 0 fullum .
SFX 200 0 fullur .
SFX 200 0 fult .

#aktingarløn
SFX 201 N 12
SFX 201 0 løn .
SFX 201 0 løna .
SFX 201 0 lønanna .
SFX 201 0 lønar .
SFX 201 0 lønarinnar .
SFX 201 0 lønin .
SFX 201 0 lønina .
SFX 201 0 lønini .
SFX 201 0 lønir .
SFX 201 0 lønirnar .
SFX 201 0 lønum .
SFX 201 0 lønunum .

#afturleið
SFX 202 N 12
SFX 202 0 leið .
SFX 202 0 leiða .
SFX 202 0 leiðanna .
SFX 202 0 leiðar .
SFX 202 0 leiðarinnar .
SFX 202 0 leiðin .
SFX 202 0 leiðina .
SFX 202 0 leiðini .
SFX 202 0 leiðir .
SFX 202 0 leiðirnar .
SFX 202 0 leiðum .
SFX 202 0 leiðunum .

#andøvssessur
SFX 203 N 16
SFX 203 0 a .
SFX 203 0 anna .
SFX 203 0 ar .
SFX 203 0 arnar .
SFX 203 0 arnir .
SFX 203 0 i .
SFX 203 0 in .
SFX 203 0 ins .
SFX 203 0 inum .
SFX 203 0 ir .
SFX 203 0 irnar .
SFX 203 0 irnir .
SFX 203 0 um .
SFX 203 0 unum .
SFX 203 0 ur .
SFX 203 0 urin .

#alisfrøðingur
SFX 204 N 15
SFX 204 0 frøðing .
SFX 204 0 frøðinga .
SFX 204 0 frøðinganna .
SFX 204 0 frøðingar .
SFX 204 0 frøðingarnar .
SFX 204 0 frøðingarnir .
SFX 204 0 frøðingi .
SFX 204 0 frøðingin .
SFX 204 0 frøðinginum .
SFX 204 0 frøðings .
SFX 204 0 frøðingsins .
SFX 204 0 frøðingum .
SFX 204 0 frøðingunum .
SFX 204 0 frøðingur .
SFX 204 0 frøðingurin .

#aðalborin
SFX 205 N 8
SFX 205 0 borið .
SFX 205 0 borin .
SFX 205 0 borna .
SFX 205 0 bornan .
SFX 205 0 bornar .
SFX 205 0 bornari .
SFX 205 0 bornir .
SFX 205 0 bornum .

#aldugerð
SFX 206 N 6
SFX 206 0 gerð .
SFX 206 0 gerðar .
SFX 206 0 gerðarinnar .
SFX 206 0 gerðin .
SFX 206 0 gerðina .
SFX 206 0 gerðini .

#beinlítil
SFX 207 N 8
SFX 207 0 lítið .
SFX 207 0 lítil .
SFX 207 0 lítla .
SFX 207 0 lítlan .
SFX 207 0 lítlar .
SFX 207 0 lítlari .
SFX 207 0 lítlir .
SFX 207 0 lítlum .

#alduryggur
SFX 208 N 15
SFX 208 j 0 .
SFX 208 j i .
SFX 208 j in .
SFX 208 j inum .
SFX 208 j ir .
SFX 208 j irnar .
SFX 208 j irnir .
SFX 208 j ur .
SFX 208 j urin .
SFX 208 0 a .
SFX 208 0 anna .
SFX 208 0 ar .
SFX 208 0 arins .
SFX 208 0 um .
SFX 208 0 unum .

#ársskeið
SFX 209 N 12
SFX 209 0 skeið .
SFX 209 0 skeiða .
SFX 209 0 skeiðanna .
SFX 209 0 skeiði .
SFX 209 0 skeiðið .
SFX 209 0 skeiðini .
SFX 209 0 skeiðinum .
SFX 209 0 skeiðnum .
SFX 209 0 skeiðs .
SFX 209 0 skeiðsins .
SFX 209 0 skeiðum .
SFX 209 0 skeiðunum .

#aðaltáttur
SFX 210 N 3
SFX 210 0 ir .
SFX 210 0 irnar .
SFX 210 0 irnir .

#aldinviður
SFX 211 N 8
SFX 211 0 við .
SFX 211 0 viðar .
SFX 211 0 viðarins .
SFX 211 0 viði .
SFX 211 0 viðin .
SFX 211 0 viðinum .
SFX 211 0 viður .
SFX 211 0 viðurin .
